Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 9. Use of Apprenticeship Programs on Public Works Projects

Postponed enactment. —

Laws 2005, ch. 226, § 2, enacts this article effective January 1, 2006.

§ 16-6-901.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

16-6-901

and

16-6-902

], unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Apprentice” means an apprentice enrolled and registered in an approved apprenticeship training program;

“Apprentice utilization preference” means the preference that is given to public works contract bidders who commit to ensure the appropriate percentage of labor hours will be performed by apprentices;

“Labor hours” means the total hours of workers receiving an hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the public works project. “Labor hours” includes hours worked by persons employed by the contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. “Labor hours” does not include hours worked by foremen, superintendents and owners;

“Approved apprenticeship training program” means an apprenticeship training program approved by and registered with the bureau of apprenticeship and training, United States department of labor;

“Department” means the department of workforce services.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 226, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-6-902.
Apprentices to be used on public works projects; waiver; report.

For all public works awarded by the state, the University of Wyoming, a community college or a school district pursuant to W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-206

estimated to cost one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) or more, a contractor who commits to ensure that not less than ten percent (10%) of the labor hours shall be worked by apprentices shall have his bid considered as if his bid were one percent (1%) lower than the actual dollar value of his bid. The contractor awarded a contract under this section, after consideration of all other applicable preferences under this chapter, shall be awarded the contract at the actual dollar value of his bid under this section. This subsection shall not apply to those state agencies that have a recognized or approved apprenticeship training program requirement by the United States department of labor or other appropriate federally funded program.

Following award of a contract under subsection (a) of this section, the department may, upon a demonstration of good cause shown by the contractor, excuse the contractor from the requirement that not less than ten percent (10%) of the labor hours on a specific project be performed by apprentices.

A contractor awarded a contract under this section shall make reasonable efforts to comply with the apprentice utilization preference provisions in this section so that the appropriate percentage of total labor hours is performed by apprentices. The contractor shall report to the department within fifteen (15) days after completion of the project, providing a statement describing compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section if he received preferential consideration of his bid based on a commitment to ensure the specified total labor hours on the project would be performed by apprentices. The department shall report to the agency that awarded the contract, any contractor who received preferential consideration of his bid based on a commitment to ensure the specified total labor hours would be performed by apprentices on a project and who fails to file such report, or who fails to meet the total labor hours commitment for apprentices specified in his bid. Any contractor failing to file a report or failing to meet the total labor hours requirement for apprentices specified in his bid shall forfeit one percent (1%) of the total project cost to the state agency that awarded the contract, which amount shall be credited to the account from which the project was funded, unless good cause is shown as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

The department shall provide necessary assistance to an agency awarding a contract subject to the provisions of this section. The department shall collect the following data from each affected contractor for each project covered by this section:

The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them;

The number, type and rationale for the exceptions granted under subsection (b) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

By January 1 of each year beginning in 2007, the department shall compile and summarize the collected data in subsection (e) of this section and provide a report to the governor, the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint education interim committee. The report shall include any recommendations for modifications or improvements to the apprentice utilization program.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 226, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (f), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.